Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4063
Licensure requirements; waiver; when.

(1) The director shall waive any requirements for a nonresident insurance producer license applicant with a valid license from his or her home state, except the requirements imposed by section 44-4055, if the applicant's home state awards nonresident licenses to residents of this state on the same basis.

(2) A nonresident producer's satisfaction of his or her home state's continuing education requirements for licensed insurance producers shall constitute satisfaction of this state's continuing education requirements if the nonresident producer's home state recognizes the satisfaction of its continuing education requirements imposed upon insurance producers from this state on the same basis.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 17.